Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-107 Verification of insurance:
motor vehicles. (a) Every insurer shall issue to its insureds a paper or
electronic motor vehicle insurance identification card for each motor vehicle
for which the basic motor vehicle insurance coverage is written. The
electronic motor vehicle insurance identification card may be accessed directly
through the licensed insurer's website, application, or database. The
identification card shall contain the following:

(1) Name of make and factory or serial number of the
motor vehicle; provided that insurers of five or more motor vehicles which are
under common registered ownership and used in the regular course of business
shall not be required to indicate the name of make and the factory or serial
number of each motor vehicle;

(2) Policy number;

(3) Names of the insured and the insurer; and

(4) Effective dates of coverage including the
expiration date.

(b) The identification card shall be in the
insured motor vehicle or accessible on a mobile electronic device, as defined
in section 291C-137, at all times and shall be exhibited to a law enforcement
officer upon demand.

(c) The identification card shall be resistant
to forgery by whatever means appropriate. The commissioner shall approve the
construction, form, and design of the identification card to ensure that the
card is forgery resistant.

(d) The commissioner shall issue a certificate
of self-insurance periodically, as necessary, for use in each motor vehicle
insured under section 431:10C-105.

(e) The identification card issued by an
insurer shall not be issued for a period exceeding the period for which
premiums have been paid or earned; provided that this subsection shall apply
only to the first application of a person for a motor vehicle insurance policy
and shall not apply to applications for commercial and fleet vehicles. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 251, §18; am L 1998, c 207, §1; am L 2000, c 24,
§6; am L 2016, c 82, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next